Mississippi, session 2026, SB2672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-53-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-1.  The Legislature recognizes that in order for the State of Mississippi to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology and services now in operation or which will in the future be placed in operation, there should be full cooperation and cohesive planning and effort by and between the several state agencies and that it is the responsibility of the Legislature to provide statutory authority therefor.  The Legislature, therefore, declares and determines that for these and other related purposes there is hereby established an agency of state government to be known as the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS).  The Legislature further declares that the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS) shall provide statewide services that facilitate cost-effective information processing and telecommunication solutions.  State agencies shall work in full cooperation with the board of MDITS to identify opportunities to minimize duplication, reduce costs and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries.  The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the Department of Health and the Department of Revenue for the purposes of implementing, administering and enforcing the provisions of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, for acquisitions made before June 30, 2024. SECTION 2.  Section 25-53-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-3.  (1)  Whenever the term "Central Data Processing Authority" or the term "authority," when referring to the Central Data Processing Authority, is used in any law, rule, regulation, document or elsewhere, it shall be construed to mean the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (2)  For the purposes of this chapter the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context otherwise requires: (a)  "Central Data Processing Authority" and "CDPA" mean "Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS)" and the term "authority" means "board of the ITS." (b)  "Bureau of Systems Policy and Planning," "Bureau of Telecommunications," "Bureau of Central Data Processing" and "bureau" mean "ITS." (c) "Acquisition" of information technology means the purchase, lease, rental, or acquisition in any other manner of any such information technology. (d)  "Agency" means and includes all the various state agencies, officers, departments, boards, commissions, offices and institutions of the state. (e)  "Governing authority" means boards of supervisors, governing boards of all school districts, all boards of directors of public water supply districts, boards of directors of master public water supply districts, municipal public utility commissions, governing authorities of all municipalities, port authorities, commissioners and boards of trustees of any public hospitals and any governing authority of the state supported wholly or in part by public funds of the state or governing authority thereof. (f)  "Bid" means any of the valid source selection techniques and competitive procurement methods appropriate to information technology procurement in the public sector, including, but not limited to, competitive sealed bidding, competitive sealed proposals, simplified small purchase procedures, sole source procurements, and emergency procurements. (g) "Telecommunications transmission facility" means any transmission medium, switch, instrument, inside wiring system or other facility which is used, in whole or part, to provide any transmission. (h)  "Equipment support contract" means a contract which covers a single, specific class or classes of telecommunications equipment or service and all features associated with that class, through which state agencies may purchase or lease the item of equipment or service specified by issuing a purchase order under the terms of the contract without the necessity of further competitive bidding. (i)  "Inside wiring system" means any wiring which: (i)  Directly or indirectly, interconnects any terminal equipment with any other terminal equipment or with any regulated facility or common carrier services; and (ii)  Is located at the premises of the customer and is not inside any terminal equipment. (j) "Procurement" means the selling, buying, purchasing, renting, leasing or otherwise obtaining information technology as well as activities engaged in, resulting in or expected to result in selling, buying, purchasing, renting, leasing or otherwise obtaining information technology. (k) "Telecommunications equipment, systems, related services" are limited to the equipment and means to provide: (i)  Telecommunications transmission facilities. (ii)  Telephone systems, including voice processing systems. (iii)  Facsimile systems. (iv)  Radio paging services. (v)  Mobile telephone services, including cellular mobile telephone service. (vi)  Intercom and paging systems. (vii)  Video teleconferencing systems. (viii)  Personal communications networks and services. (ix)  Any and all systems based on emerging and future telecommunications technologies relative to (i) through (viii) above. (l)  "Telecommunications system lease contract" means a contract between a supplier of telecommunications systems, including equipment and related services, and the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (m)  "Tariffed or regulated service" means telecommunications service offered by common carriers and subject to control by the Mississippi Public Service Commission or the Federal Communications Commission. (n)  "State Data Center" means one or more facilities operated by ITS to provide information technology resources requiring enterprise computing resources or any other ITS managed information resources. (o)  "Information technology" means any technology as defined by ITS, including, but not limited to, computer and/or telecommunications equipment, systems or related services. SECTION 3.  Section 25-53-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-5.  The authority shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities: (a)  The authority shall provide for the development of plans for the efficient acquisition and utilization of information technology by all agencies of state government, and provide for their implementation.  In so doing, the authority may use the ITS' staff, at the discretion of the executive director of the authority, or the authority may contract for the services of qualified consulting firms in the field of information technology and utilize the service of such consultants as may be necessary for such purposes. (b)  The authority shall immediately institute procedures for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and supervise the efficient execution of the powers and duties of the executive director of the ITS.  In the execution of its functions under this chapter, the authority shall maintain as a paramount consideration the successful internal organization and operation of the several agencies so that efficiency existing therein shall not be adversely affected or impaired.  In executing its functions in relation to the institutions of higher learning and junior colleges in the state, the authority shall take into consideration the special needs of such institutions in relation to the fields of teaching and scientific research. (c)  The authority shall adopt rules, regulations, and procedures governing the acquisition of information technology which shall, to the fullest extent practicable, ensure the maximum of competition between all manufacturers of supplies or equipment or services.  In the writing of specifications, in the making of contracts relating to the acquisition of such information technology, and in the performance of its other duties the authority shall provide for the maximum compatibility of all information systems hereafter installed or utilized by all state agencies and may require the use of common computer languages where necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.  The authority may establish by regulation and charge reasonable fees on a nondiscriminatory basis for the furnishing to bidders of copies of bid specifications and other documents issued by the authority. (d)  The authority shall adopt rules and regulations governing the sharing with, or the sale or lease of information technology services to any nonstate agency or person. Such regulations shall provide that any such sharing, sale or lease shall be restricted in that same shall be accomplished only where such services are not readily available otherwise within the state, and then only at a charge to the user not less than the prevailing rate of charge for similar services by private enterprise within this state. (e)  The authority may, in its discretion, establish a special technical advisory committee or committees to study and make recommendations on matters within the competence of the authority as the authority may see fit.  Persons serving on any such committees shall be entitled to receive their actual and necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of such duties, together with mileage as provided by law for state employees, provided the same has been authorized by a resolution duly adopted by the authority and entered on its minutes prior to the performance of such duties.  For the purposes of this paragraph, such committee meetings are exempt from the requirements of Sections 25-41-1 through 25-41-17. (f)  The authority may provide for the development and require the adoption of standardized computer programs and may provide for the dissemination of information to and the establishment of training programs for the personnel of the various information technology centers of state agencies and personnel of the agencies utilizing the services thereof. (g)  The authority shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations requiring the reporting to the authority through the office of executive director of such information as may be required for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and may also establish such reasonable procedures to be followed in the presentation of bills for payment under the terms of all contracts for the acquisition of information technology now or hereafter in force as may be required by the authority or by the executive director in the execution of their powers and duties. (h)  The authority shall require such adequate documentation of information technology procedures utilized by the various state agencies and may require the establishment of such organizational structures within state agencies relating to information technology operations as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. (i)  The authority may adopt such further reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary to fully implement the purposes of this chapter.  All rules and regulations adopted by the authority shall be published in readily accessible form to all affected state agencies, and to all current suppliers of computer equipment and services to the state, and to all prospective suppliers requesting the same. Such rules and regulations shall be kept current, be periodically revised, and copies thereof shall be available at all times for inspection by the public at reasonable hours in the offices of the authority.  Whenever possible no rule, regulation or any proposed amendment to such rules and regulations shall be finally adopted or enforced until copies of the proposed rules and regulations have been published. (j)  The authority shall establish rules and regulations which shall provide for the submission of all contracts proposed to be executed by the executive director for information technology, including cloud computing, to the authority for approval before final execution, and the authority may provide that such contracts involving the expenditure of less than such specified amount as may be established by the authority may be finally executed by the executive director without first obtaining such approval by the authority. (k)  The authority is authorized to consider new technologies, such as cloud computing, to purchase, lease, or rent information technology and to operate that information technology when in its opinion such operation will provide maximum efficiency and economy in the functions of any such agency or agencies. (l)  Upon the request of the governing body of a political subdivision or instrumentality, the authority shall assist the political subdivision or instrumentality in its development of plans for the efficient acquisition and utilization of information technology.  An appropriate fee shall be charged the political subdivision by the authority for such assistance. (m)  The authority shall adopt rules and regulations governing the protest procedures to be followed by any actual or prospective bidder, offerer or contractor who is aggrieved in connection with the solicitation or award of a contract for the acquisition of information technology.  Such rules and regulations shall prescribe the manner, time and procedure for making protests and may provide that a protest not timely filed shall be summarily denied.  The authority may require the protesting party, at the time of filing the protest, to post a bond, payable to the state, in an amount that the authority determines sufficient to cover any expense or loss incurred by the state; however, in no event may the amount of the bond required exceed a reasonable estimate of the total project cost.  The authority, in its discretion, also may prohibit any prospective bidder, offerer or contractor who is a party to any protest or litigation involving any such contract with the state, the authority or any agency of the state to participate in any other such bid, offer or contract, or to be awarded any such contract, during the pendency of the protest or litigation. (n)  The authority shall make a report in writing to the Legislature each year in the month of January.  Such report shall contain a full and detailed account of the work of the authority for the preceding year as specified in Section 25-53-29(3). All acquisitions of information technology involving the expenditure of funds in excess of the dollar amount established in Section 31-7-13(c), or rentals or leases in excess of the dollar amount established in Section 31-7-13(c) for the term of the contract, shall be based upon bid.  The authority may reserve the right to reject any or all bids, and if all bids are rejected, the authority may negotiate a contract within the limitations of the specifications so long as the terms of any such negotiated contract are equal to or better than the lowest bidder, and so long as the total cost to the State of Mississippi does not exceed the lowest bid.  If the authority accepts one (1) of such bids, it shall be that which is the lowest and best.  The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to acquisitions of information technology equipment and services made by the Mississippi Department of Health and the Mississippi Department of Revenue for the purposes of implementing, administering and enforcing the provisions of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act by June 30, 2024. (o)  When applicable, the authority may procure information technology in accordance with the law or regulations, or both, which govern the Bureau of Purchasing of the Office of General Services or which govern the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services procurement of information technology. (p)  The authority is authorized to purchase, lease, or rent information technology for the purpose of establishing pilot projects to investigate emerging technologies.  These acquisitions shall be limited to new technologies and shall be limited to an amount set by annual appropriation of the Legislature.  These acquisitions shall be exempt from the advertising and bidding requirement. (q)  To promote the maximum use and benefit from technology and services now in operation or which will in the future be placed in operation and to identify opportunities, minimize duplication, reduce costs and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services the authority is authorized to: (i)  Enter into master agreements for information technology, including cloud computing, available for shared use by state agencies, institutions of higher learning and governing authorities; and (ii)  Enter into contracts for the acquisition of information technology, including cloud computing, that have been acquired by other entities, located within or outside of the State of Mississippi, so long as it is determined by the authority to be in the best interest of the state.  The acquisitions provided in this paragraph (q) shall be exempt from the advertising and bidding requirements of Sections 25-53-1 et seq. and 31-7-1 et seq. (r)  All fees collected by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature. (s)  The authority shall work closely with the council to bring about effective coordination of policies, standards and procedures relating to procurement of remote sensing and geographic information systems (GIS) resources. (t)  The authority shall manage one or more State Data Centers to provide information technology services on a cost-sharing basis.  In determining the appropriate services to be provided through the State Data Center, the authority should consider those services that: (i)  Result in savings to the state as a whole; (ii)  Improve and enhance the security and reliability of the state's information and business systems; and (iii)  Optimize the efficient use of the state's information technology assets, including, but not limited to, promoting partnerships with the state institutions of higher learning and community colleges to capitalize on advanced information technology resources. (u)  The authority shall oversee the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange, ensuring compliance with the requirements of Section 25-53-281.  The Department of Information Technology Services shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to develop, implement and oversee the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange.  The department shall engage with state agencies and other stakeholders to identify data-sharing opportunities and address potential barriers.  Additionally, the department shall establish a Chief Information Officer (CIO) Council, composed of information technology leadership from state agencies, to provide strategic oversight, promote interoperability and recommend policies to enhance the effectiveness and security of statewide data-sharing initiatives. (v)  The authority shall increase federal participation in the cost of the State Data Center to the extent provided by law and its shared technology infrastructure through providing such shared services to agencies that receive federal funds.  With regard to state institutions of higher learning and community colleges, the authority may provide shared services when mutually agreeable, following a determination by both the authority and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, as the case may be, that the sharing of services is mutually beneficial. (w)  The authority, in its discretion, may require new or replacement agency business applications to be hosted at the State Data Center.  With regard to state institutions of higher learning and community colleges, the authority and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, as the case may be, may agree that institutions of higher learning or community colleges may utilize business applications that are hosted at the State Data Center, following a determination by both the authority and the applicable board that the hosting of those applications is mutually beneficial.  In addition, the authority may establish partnerships to capitalize on the advanced technology resources of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, following a determination by both the authority and the applicable board that such a partnership is mutually beneficial. (x)  The authority shall provide a periodic update regarding reform-based information technology initiatives to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees. From and after July 1, 2018, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund.  In addition, in order to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology and services, expenses for the provision of statewide shared services that facilitate cost-effective information technology shall be defrayed by pass-through funding and shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature.  These funds shall only be utilized to pay the actual costs incurred by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services for providing these shared services to state agencies. Furthermore, state agencies shall work in full cooperation with the Board of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services to identify information technology to minimize duplication, reduce costs, and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries. SECTION 4.  Section 25-53-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-7.  (1)  The membership of the authority shall be composed of five (5) members to be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The initial terms of the members shall be for one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years, respectively, and thereafter all terms shall be for five (5) years.  Each member may continue to serve for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months after the expiration of his term if his successor is not duly appointed.  The initial appointments to the reconstituted authority shall be made no later than June 30, 1984, for terms to begin on July 1, 1984. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments for the unexpired portion of the term vacated.  Each member of the authority shall have a minimum of four (4) years' experience in an information technology-related executive position or prior service as a member of the authority. (2)  Each member of the authority shall be required to furnish a surety bond in the minimum amount of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) to be approved by the Secretary of State, conditioned according to law and payable to the State of Mississippi, before entering upon his duties.  The premiums on such bonds shall be paid from any funds available to the authority for such purpose. (3)  No member of the authority, nor its executive director, shall, during his term as such member or director, have any substantial beneficial interest in any corporation or other organization engaged in the information technology business either as manufacturer, supplier, lessor, or otherwise.  All members and the executive director shall fully disclose in writing any such beneficial interest, and such disclosure shall be entered on the minutes of the authority. (4)  The Lieutenant Governor may designate one (1) Senator and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may designate one (1) Representative to attend any meeting of the authority. The appointing authorities may designate an alternate member from their respective houses to serve when the regular designee is unable to attend such meetings of the authority.  Such legislative designees shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the authority. For attending meetings of the authority, such legislators shall receive per diem and expenses which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the authority will be paid while the Legislature is in session.  No per diem and expenses will be paid except for attending meetings of the authority without prior approval of the proper committee in their respective houses. SECTION 5.  Section 25-53-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-9.  The members of the authority shall be compensated by a per diem as is authorized by Section 25-3-69 for each day spent in actual discharge of their duties, and shall be reimbursed for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in Section 25-3-41.  No authority member may incur per diem, travel, or other expenses unless previously authorized by vote at a meeting of the authority, which action shall be recorded in the official minutes of said meeting. SECTION 6.  Section 25-53-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-11.  The authority shall meet regularly at a place designated by it once each calendar month and shall meet at such other times as may be set upon call of the chairman or a majority of the members of the authority.  At its first meeting, the authority shall organize and elect a chairman and vice chairman and, as soon as practicable thereafter, the authority shall adopt such rules and regulations, not contrary to the provisions of this chapter and the other laws of the State of Mississippi, as shall be necessary and proper to govern its proceedings. The authority may either elect a secretary from among its membership or delegate the executive director or another employee of the authority as its secretary. SECTION 7.  Section 25-53-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-13.  In order to have a quorum for a meeting of the authority, at least three (3) members of the authority must be present. SECTION 8.  Section 25-53-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-15.  Any member of the authority may have his vote on any question before the authority recorded on the minutes thereof at the time of the vote, and a member of the authority who votes against an illegal or unauthorized expenditure of funds may not be held liable therefor. SECTION 9.  Section 25-53-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-17.  The authority shall keep full, complete, and permanent minutes and records of all its proceedings, including the rules and regulations adopted by it, and said minutes shall be signed by the chairman, or vice-chairman, and attested by the secretary. SECTION 10.  Section 25-53-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-19.  The authority shall select an executive director, with the advice and consent of the Senate, who shall be the administrative officer of the authority and shall perform such duties as are required of him by law and such other duties as may be assigned him by the authority, and who shall receive such compensation as may be fixed by the authority, subject to the approval of the state personnel board.  In addition, he shall be entitled to remuneration for his necessary traveling expenses consistent with general law. The executive director shall be a graduate of an accredited university with a degree in engineering, business administration, electronic communications, information technology or a related field, with at least ten (10) years' experience in information technology, electronic communications, or a related field, of which at least five (5) years shall be in a responsible high level management position with a demonstrated record of management expertise demonstrated through knowledge in the application of information technology and electronic communications.  The qualifications for the executive director prescribed herein shall not apply to the executive director serving on June 30, 1984. The executive director shall have no vote in the decisions of said authority, but shall offer such professional or technical advice and assistance to the authority as may be required of him.  Said executive director, in order to qualify for his position, shall be required to make a good and sufficient bond in some surety company qualified and doing business in the State of Mississippi, in the minimum penal sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties as required by law and the directives of the authority.  The premium on said bond shall be paid from any funds available to the authority for such purpose.  Said executive director may be removed at any time upon a majority vote of the membership of said authority. The executive director, with the approval of the authority, shall employ such technical, professional, and clerical help as may be authorized by the authority; and the authority, upon the recommendation of the executive director, shall define the duties and fix the compensation of such employees. SECTION 11.  Section 25-53-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-21.  The executive director shall have the following duties, responsibilities and authority: (a)  He shall conduct continuing studies of all information technology activities carried out by all agencies of the state and shall develop a long-range plan for the efficient and economical performance of such activities in state government.  Such plan shall be submitted to the authority for its approval and, having been approved by the authority, shall be implemented by the executive director and all state agencies.  Such plan shall be continuously reviewed and modifications thereof shall be proposed to the authority by the executive director as developments in information technology techniques and changes in the structure, activities, and functions of state government may require. (b)  He shall review the purchasing practices of all state agencies in the area of the purchasing of supplies for information technology and make recommendations to the authority for the institution of purchasing procedures which will ensure the most economical procurement of such supplies commensurate with the efficient operation of all departments and agencies of state government. (c)  He shall see that all reports required of all agencies are promptly and accurately made in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the authority.  Either in person or through his authorized agents, he shall make such inspections of information technology operations being conducted by any of the agencies of the state as may be necessary for the performance of his duties. (d)  He shall suggest and cause to be brought about cooperation between the several state agencies in order to provide efficiency in information technology operation.  He shall, together with the heads of the agencies involved, reduce to writing and execute cooperative plans for the acquisition and operation of information technology equipment, and any such plan so adopted shall be carried out in accordance with the provisions of such plan unless the same shall be amended by the joint action of the executive director and the heads of agencies involved.  The executive director shall report to the authority the details of any plan so adopted and all amendments or modifications thereof, and shall otherwise report to the authority any failure on the part of any agency to carry out the provisions of such plan.  In the event the head of any agency involved or the executive director shall propose amendments to a plan so adopted and such amendment is disapproved by the head of another agency involved or the executive director, an appeal may be taken to the authority which may, after full consideration thereof, order the adoption of the proposed amendment or any modification thereof.  The executive director shall make decisions on all questions of the division of the cost of information technology operations among the several agencies, but his findings shall be subject to the approval or modification by the authority on appeal to it. (e)  He shall review all contracts for acquisition of information technology now or hereafter in force and may require the renegotiation, termination, amendment or execution of any such contracts in proper form and in accordance with the policies and rules and regulations and subject to the direction of the authority.  A contract that expires by its terms may be renewed if it is the intent of all parties to renew the contract within a reasonable timeframe.  In the negotiation and execution of such contracts, the executive director may negotiate a limitation on the liability to the state of prospective contractors provided such limitation affords the state reasonable protection and the limitation is approved by the state entity for whom the acquisition is being made.  For purposes of this section, reasonable protection does not include limitations on intentional torts, negligence, death, bodily injury, bad faith, breach of state data, infringement issues and damage to tangible state property. (f)  He shall act as the purchasing and contracting agent for the State of Mississippi in the negotiation and execution of all contracts for the acquisition of information technology.  He shall receive, review, and promptly approve or disapprove all requests of agencies of the state for the acquisition of information technology, which are submitted in accordance with rules and regulations of the authority.  In the event that any such request is disapproved, he shall immediately notify the requesting agency and the members of the authority in writing of such disapproval, stating his reasons therefor.  The disapproval of any request by the executive director of the authority may be appealed to the authority in such manner as may be authorized by such reasonable rules and regulations hereby authorized to be adopted by the authority.  The executive director shall report the approval of all such requests to the authority in such manner as may be directed by the authority, and shall execute any such contracts only after complying with rules and regulations which may be adopted by the authority in relation thereto.  Any contracts for personal or professional services entered into by the executive director shall be exempted from the requirements of Section 25-9-120(3) relating to submission of such contract to the State Personal Service Contract Review Board. (g)  He shall suggest and cause to be brought about cooperation between the several state agencies, departments and institutions in order that work may be done by one agency for another agency, and equipment in one agency may be made available to another agency, and suggest and cause to be brought about such improvements as may be necessary in joint or cooperative information technology operations. (h)  He shall be designated as the "Chief Information Confidentiality Officer" after being duly sworn to the oath of this office by the chairman of the authority and shall be responsible for administering the oath to other qualified officers he may designate. (i)  He shall appoint employees of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or at his discretion, employees of other state agencies and institutions that are responsible for handling or processing data for any agency or institution other than that for which they are employed, to a position of information custodial care that shall be known as "Information Confidentiality Officer." The selection and swearing of all officers shall be reported to the authority at the next regular meeting and names, affirmation dates and employment dates shall be recorded in the permanent minutes of the authority. SECTION 12.  Section 25-53-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-23.  The authority shall act upon all appeals of decisions made by the executive director thereof and shall, upon such appeals, approve or disapprove such administrative actions as may be taken by him.  The form of an appeal to the full authority from an action or recommendation of the executive director thereof shall be a written communication from the executive head of the agency or agencies involved to the chairman of the authority, stating the objection and a request to appear before the full authority to present the case in point, on which appeal the authority shall take such action as is indicated by the facts presented to or made available to the authority. SECTION 13.  Section 25-53-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-25.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 25-53-5, 25-53-25(5) or any other provision of law, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to imply exemption from the public purchases law, being Section 31-7-1 et seq. (2)  The authority may establish policies and procedures for the purpose of delegating the acquisition and contracting responsibilities related to the procurement of information technology to the purchasing agency.  Such policies and procedures must address the following issues: (a)  Establish categories of equipment or services affected; (b)  Establish maximum unit and/or ceiling prices of such procurements; (c)  Establish reporting, monitoring and control of such procurements; and (d)  Establish other such rules and regulations as necessary to fully implement the purposes of this section.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to imply exemption from the public purchases law, being Section 31-7-1 et seq. (3)  Acquisitions of information technology by institutions of higher learning or junior colleges wholly with federal funds and not with state general funds shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter; however, nothing in this subsection shall be construed to imply an exemption of such acquisitions from the public purchases law, being Section 31-7-1 et seq. (4)  [Repealed] (5)  Acquisitions of information technology made by agencies while exempt from the public purchasing requirements of this chapter and/or as specified in the authority's regulations shall remain exempt until a new acquisition is required, as determined by ITS. SECTION 14.  Section 25-53-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-29.  (1)  For the purposes of this section the term "bureau" shall mean the "Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services."  The authority shall have the following powers and responsibilities to carry out the establishment of policy and provide for long-range planning and consulting: (a)  Provide a high level of technical expertise for agencies, institutions, political subdivisions and other governmental entities as follows:  planning; consulting; project management; systems and performance review; system definition; design; application programming; training; development and documentation; implementation; maintenance; and other tasks as may be required, within the resources available to the bureau. (b)  Publish written planning guides, policies and procedures for use by agencies and institutions in planning future information technology.  The bureau may require agencies and institutions to submit data, including periodic electronic equipment inventory listings, information on agency staffing, systems under study, planned applications for the future, and other information needed for the purposes of preparing the state master plan.  The bureau may require agencies and institutions to submit any additional data required for purposes of preparing the state master plan. (c)  Inspect agency facilities and equipment, interview agency employees and review records at any time deemed necessary by the bureau for the purpose of identifying cost-effective applications of electronic information technology.  Upon conclusion of any inspection, the bureau shall issue a management letter containing cost estimates and recommendations to the agency head and governing board concerning applications identified that would result in staff reductions, other monetary savings and improved delivery of public services. (d)  Conduct classroom and on-site training for end users for applications and systems developed by the bureau. (e)  Provide consulting services to agencies and institutions or Mississippi governmental subdivisions requesting technical assistance in information technology.  The bureau may submit proposals and enter into contracts to provide services to agencies and institutions or governmental subdivisions for such purposes. (2)  The bureau shall annually issue a three-year master plan in writing to the Governor, available on request to any member of the Legislature, including recommended statewide strategies and goals for the effective and efficient use of information technology in state government.  The report shall also include recommended information policy actions and other recommendations for consideration by the Governor and members of the Legislature. (3)  The bureau shall make an annual report in writing to the Governor, available on request to any member of the Legislature, to include a full and detailed account of the work of the authority for the preceding year.  The report shall contain recommendations to agencies and institutions resulting from inspections or consulting contracts. The report shall also contain a summary of the master plan, progress made, and legislative and policy recommendations for consideration by the Governor and members of the Legislature. (4)  The bureau may charge fees to agencies and institutions for services rendered to them.  The bureau may charge fees to vendors to recover the cost of providing procurement services and  the delivery of procurement awards to public bodies.  The amounts of such fees shall be set by the authority upon recommendation of the Executive Director of the ITS, and all such fees collected shall be paid into the fund established for carrying out the purposes of this section. (5)  The bureau may, from time to time, at the discretion of the Executive Director of ITS, contract with firms or qualified individuals to be used to augment the bureau's professional staff in order to assure timely completion and implementation of assigned tasks, provided that funds are available in the fund established for carrying out the purposes of this section.  Such individuals may be employees of any agency, bureau or institution provided that these individuals or firms meet the requirements of other individuals or firms doing business with the state through the ITS.  Individuals who are employees of an agency or institution may contract with the ITS only with the concurrence of the agency or institution for whom they are employed. From and after July 1, 2018, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund.  In addition, in order to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology, expenses for the provision of statewide shared services that facilitate cost-effective information processing and telecommunication solutions shall be defrayed by pass-through funding and shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature.  These funds shall only be utilized to pay the actual costs incurred by the ITS for providing these shared services to state agencies.  Furthermore, state agencies shall work in full cooperation with the ITS to identify information technology to minimize duplication, reduce costs, and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries. SECTION 15.  Section 25-53-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-51.  (1)  To qualify for the position of information confidentiality officer a person must: (a)  Be an employee of a state agency or institution in a position such that his duties require him to handle or process or supervise the handling or processing of data in conjunction with the use of automated information technology equipment for an agency or institution other than that for whom he is regularly employed. (b)  Have been continuously employed for a period of at least one hundred eighty (180) days by such agency or institution or have successfully been cleared for employment through an investigation that shall consist of a determination as to good moral character and that the prospective employee has not been convicted of a felony.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for employment at the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  A prospective employee may be provisionally employed based on a reference check by the employing agency pending final receipt of the results of a national criminal history record check for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days. (c)  Successfully complete a suitable instructional course on the subjects of information security, privacy and confidentiality and protection, to be developed and taught under the supervision of the executive director.  An employee may work in a provisional capacity under the direct supervision of an information confidentiality officer as part of an on-the-job training program while completing instructional requirements, for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days. (d)  Be duly sworn to the following oath:  "I, ______, do solemnly swear to protect and uphold the confidentiality of all information that may come to my knowledge that is designated as 'confidential information' by another state agency or institution for which I may handle or process in the normal course of my duties.  I swear to exercise reasonable care in the handling and processing of all such designated data and further that I will not reveal or otherwise divulge information from such data obtained.  I understand that proven violation of this oath will subject me to forfeiture of my bond and dismissal from employment." (2)  In order to maintain appropriate liability insurance necessary to cover damages for any nonmalicious act, the Department of Information Technology Services will work in conjunction with the Tort Claims Board. (3)  In order to clear vendors, such as maintenance personnel, security personnel, cleaning personnel, contractors and other vendors with a valid need to gain access into the State Data Centers and campus, the department shall determine these individuals have not been convicted of a felony through a fingerprint-based criminal history background check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. SECTION 16.  Section 25-53-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-53.  Information and data shall be considered public record information and data and receive normal handling and processing unless designated as "confidential information" by the agency and institution originating the data. Information and data designated as "confidential information" will receive special handling based on procedures agreed to by the executive director and the agency or institution head and shall be handled in accordance with the oath subscribed to by the confidentiality officer. SECTION 17.  Section 25-53-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-55.  Upon written complaint of any person claiming to be adversely affected by disclosure of confidential information by any information confidentiality officer, the director shall give notice to the information confidentiality officer of the fact that such complaint has been filed and shall give such notice to the Chairman of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, who shall call a meeting of the members of the authority for the purpose of hearing such complaint.  The authority shall then conduct an investigation into the matter and shall afford to the complaining party and the information confidentiality officer a hearing, of which reasonable notice shall be given. For purposes of such hearing, the authority, under signature of the secretary of the authority attested by the chairman, shall have the power to subpoena witnesses and documentary or other evidence.  After such hearing, if the authority, based upon substantial evidence, shall find that the information confidentiality officer has disclosed confidential information in violation of his oath, the authority shall enter such finding of fact on its minutes and the information confidentiality officer shall be immediately discharged from employment.  If the authority shall find that such oath has not been violated, it shall, likewise, enter such finding on its minutes and the complaint shall be dismissed.  The finding of the authority shall be prima facie evidence of the truth thereof in any judicial procedure seeking forfeiture of the bond of such information confidentiality officer. SECTION 18.  Section 25-53-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-57.  An information confidentiality officer shall be considered a legal agent of the agency or institution and for the purposes of Sections 25-53-51 through 25-53-59 shall be considered to be an employee of the agency or institution for which he may be processing data at that particular time. SECTION 19.  Section 25-53-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-59.  Any information confidentiality officer who shall intentionally and willfully violate his oath by releasing or divulging confidential information without proper authority shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and sentenced to not exceeding one (1) year in jail or a fine of not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both. SECTION 20.  Section 25-53-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-105.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall administer the provisions of Sections 25-53-109 through 25-53-125.  The purposes and aims of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services in carrying out said provisions shall be to coordinate and promote efficiency in the acquisition, operation and maintenance of all telecommunications systems and networks being used by agencies of the state and further to coordinate the compatibility of systems and networks to the state with those of governing authorities so as to promote a uniform, compatible telecommunications system for agencies and governing authorities. SECTION 21.  Section 25-53-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-107.  (1)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the manner in which the authority and duties prescribed by Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall be carried out.  It shall employ competent personnel necessary to carry out its purposes, under rules promulgated by the State Personnel Board. (2)  The bureau, during a fiscal year, may utilize time-limited escalated positions in order to implement telecommunications enterprise decisions that yield cost avoidance, cost reductions or revenue increases and so long as the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services can provide the necessary funds without such action causing a telephone service rate increase to agency customers.  Such employees of the bureau shall be considered nonstate service employees, shall be highly qualified telecommunications professionals and may be compensated at a rate comparable to the prevailing rate of telecommunications personnel in the private sector.  Such compensation rates shall be determined by the State Personnel Director.  The number of such positions shall be set by annual appropriation legislation.  The compensation and classification of such positions and qualifications of employees shall be set by the State Personnel Board upon recommendation by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.  Nonstate service positions can be recommended for conversion to permanent state service on a case by case basis if the supported function appears long-term in duration, if accomplished in accordance with State Personnel Board procedures, and if properly identified in the state budgetary process. SECTION 22.  Section 25-53-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-109.  The bureau is hereby authorized and empowered to exercise such duties and powers necessary to effectuate the purposes of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 including the following: (a)  Form an advisory council made up of persons with expertise, and experience in the field of telecommunications for the purpose of setting goals, establishing long-range plans and policies and to oversee and assist in the procurement activities regarding telecommunications equipment and services; (b)  Provide more effective management of state telecommunications resources and implement long-range plans and procurement; (c)  Manage, plan and coordinate all telecommunications systems under the jurisdiction of the state. This centralized management function would be provided throughout the following activities: (i)  Administration of existing systems including coordination of activities, vendors, service orders and billing/record-keeping functions; (ii)  Planning of new systems or services; (iii)  Design of replacement systems; (iv)  Project management during specification writing, bid letting, proposal evaluation and contract negotiations; (v)  Implementation supervision of new systems and ongoing support; (vi) Implementation of long-term state plans; and (vii)  Management of intra-LATA and inter-LATA networks. SECTION 23.  Section 25-53-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-111.  The bureau shall have the following additional duties: (a)  To establish and coordinate through either state ownership or commercial leasing, all telecommunications systems and services affecting the management and operations of the state. (b)  To act as the sole centralized customer for the acquisition, billing and record keeping of all telecommunications systems or services provided to state agencies whether obtained through lease or purchase. (c)  To charge respective user agencies for their proportionate cost of the installation, maintenance and operation of the telecommunications systems and services, including the operation of the bureau. (d)  To offer or provide transmission, switch and network services on a reimbursable basis to agencies financed entirely by federal funds, to governing authorities and to other governmental agencies. (e)  To approve or provide state telephone services on a reimbursable basis to full-time students at state institutions of higher learning and junior colleges, including where such services are provided by the state or the institution. (f)  To develop coordinated telecommunications systems or services within and among all state agencies and require, where appropriate, cooperative utilization of telecommunications equipment and services by aggregating users.  Where such cooperative utilization of telecommunications system or service would affect an agency authorized to receive information from the National Crime Information Center of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, such plans for cooperative utilization shall first be approved by the National Crime Information Center before implementation of such telecommunications systems or service can proceed. (g)  To review, coordinate, approve or disapprove all requests by state agencies for the procurement, through purchase or contract for lease of telecommunications systems or services including telecommunication proposals, studies and consultation contracts and intra-LATA and inter-LATA transmission channels. (h)  To establish and define telecommunications systems and services specifications and designs so as to assure compatibility of telecommunications systems and services within state government and governing authorities. (i)  To provide a continuous, comprehensive analysis and inventory of telecommunications costs, facilities and systems within state government. (j)  To promote, coordinate or assist in the design and engineering of emergency telecommunications systems, including but not limited to "911" service, emergency medical services and other emergency telecommunications services. (k)  To advise and provide consultation to agencies and governing authorities with respect to telecommunications management planning and related matters and to provide training to users within state government in telecommunications technology and system use. (l)  To develop policies, procedures and long-range plans, consistent with the protection of citizens' rights to privacy and access to information, for the acquisition and use of telecommunications systems, and to base such policies on current information about state telecommunications activities in relation to the full range of emerging technologies. Any state agency requesting an increase in expenditure of funds for new telecommunications equipment systems or services shall submit to the Legislative Budget Office with its budget request preceding the fiscal year for which funding is requested detailed justification for such request.  The justification shall be provided on forms developed by the bureau in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.  In addition, all state agencies shall submit to the bureau, when requested, a long-range plan for use of telecommunications equipment, systems and services. SECTION 24.  Section 25-53-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-113.  Each and every agency of the state shall give full cooperation to the bureau in furnishing all information of any kind as it pertains to telecommunications. SECTION 25.  Section 25-53-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-113.  Each and every agency of the state shall give full cooperation to the bureau in furnishing all information of any kind as it pertains to telecommunications. SECTION 26.  Section 25-53-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-115.  No agency shall rent, lease, lease/purchase, purchase or in any way own or pay for the operation of any telecommunications system out of any funds available for the use by that agency without the written approval of the bureau. SECTION 27.  Section 25-53-117, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-117.  No agency shall be permitted to obligate the state to any vendor source for a telecommunications system of any kind.  All transactions dealing with a telecommunications system shall be conducted through the bureau, and any vendor found in violation of this policy may be prohibited from bidding on such systems for a period of time commensurate with the severity of the violation. Provided, however, that this period shall not exceed twenty-four (24) months. SECTION 28.  Section 25-53-119, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-119.  The bureau shall, subject to the provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125, have sole authority and responsibility for defining the specific telecommunications equipment, systems and related services to which the provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall be applicable.  However, the provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall not be applicable with respect to computer and telecommunications equipment, systems and related services that are only available from a sole source. SECTION 29.  Section 25-53-121, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-121.  (1)  The types of contracts permitted in the procurement of telecommunications equipment, systems and related services are defined herein, and the provisions in Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 and 25-53-5 supplement the provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services may, on behalf of any state agency, enter into an equipment support contract with a vendor of telecommunications equipment or services for the purchase or lease of such equipment or services in accordance with the following provisions: (a)  Specifications for equipment support contracts shall be developed in advance and shall conform to the following requirements: (i)  Specifications for equipment support contracts shall cover a specific class or classes of equipment and service and may include all features associated with that class or classes. (ii) Specifications in the bid for equipment support contracts shall be developed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (iii) Specifications shall be based on the projected needs of user agencies. (iv) Specifications for equipment support contracts for purchase or lease of telecommunications equipment may include specifications for the maintenance of the equipment desired. (b)  The initial procurement of an equipment support contract, and procurement of equipment and services to be utilized by agencies under an equipment support contract, shall be as follows: (i)  Equipment support contracts shall be awarded in accordance with Section 25-53-5. (ii)  A using agency may procure required telecommunications equipment and service available under an equipment support contract through release of a purchase order for the required equipment and service to the vendor holding an equipment support contract.  However, such procurement by purchase order shall be accomplished in accordance with the procedures and regulations prescribed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, and shall be subject to all other statutory requirements including approval by the bureau. (c)  The final authority for entering into equipment support contracts shall rest with the bureau, and such contracts shall be executed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services in accordance with the procedures and regulations defined by said authority. (d)  Equipment support contracts shall include the following annual appropriation dependency clause: "The continuation of this contract is contingent upon the appropriation of funds to fulfill the requirements of the contract by the Legislature.  If the Legislature fails to appropriate sufficient monies to provide for the continuance of the contract, the contract shall terminate on the date of the beginning of the first fiscal year for which funds are not appropriated." (3)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services may on behalf of any state agency enter into contracts for the lease or purchase of telecommunications equipment systems or services in accordance with the following provisions: (a)  The bureau may directly contract for or approve contracts for regulated or tariffed telecommunications services upon determination by the bureau that the application of such service is in the best interests of the State of Mississippi. (b)  All other contracts of this type shall be entered into through a bid as defined in Section 25-53-3. (c)  The justification of such contracts must be presented to the bureau.  Such justification shall identify and consider all cost factors relevant to that contract. (d)  [Deleted] (e)  All lease contracts must contain the following annual appropriation dependency clause: "The continuation of this contract is contingent upon the appropriation of funds to fulfill the requirements of the contract by the Legislature.  If the Legislature fails to appropriate sufficient monies to provide for the continuation of a contract, the contract shall terminate on the date of the beginning of the first fiscal year for which funds are not appropriated." (f)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall maintain a list of all such contracts.  This list shall show as a minimum the name of the vendor, the annual cost of each contract and the term of the contract or the purchase cost. SECTION 30.  Section 25-53-123, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-123.  (1)  The only method of procurement permitted for the acquisition of nonregulated telecommunications systems, including equipment and related services, shall be in conformity with Section 25-53-5. SECTION 31.  Section 25-53-125, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-125.  The following general provisions shall apply to all procurements under Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125: (a)  No contracts entered into hereunder shall have an initial effective date earlier than the date on which such contract receives approval as required herein. (b)  All changes, modifications and amendments to any contract hereunder shall be approved in advance by the bureau, in addition to any other approvals required by law. (c)  The bureau shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Law, Section 25-43-1.101 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, for the establishment of contract format. (d)  Where written proposals or bids are submitted by vendors, the proposal or bid of the successful vendor shall be incorporated into the final contract consummated with that vendor. (e)  The provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall, with respect to the procurement of telecommunications equipment, systems or related services, supersede specifications of any contradictory or conflicting provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, and other laws with respect to awarding public contracts. SECTION 32.  Section 25-53-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-151.  (1)  There is established in the State Treasury the "Electronic Government Services Fund," into which shall be deposited specific funds appropriated by the Legislature for developing and providing electronic government services within the State of Mississippi.  Any funds in the Electronic Government Services Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, but shall be available for expenditure in the subsequent fiscal year.  The funds in the Electronic Government Fund shall be available for expenditure pursuant to specific appropriation by the Legislature beginning in fiscal year 2002, to the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (2)  There is hereby established an Electronic Government Oversight Committee to oversee the implementation of E-Government and related technology initiatives.  Duties of this committee would include:  (a) prioritize and make recommendations for all electronic government services, in order to cut across state and local governmental organizational structures; (b) address policy issues such as privacy, security, transaction fees and accessibility; (c) review ongoing fiscal and operational management and support of portal; (d) provide a mechanism for gathering input from citizens, businesses and government entities; (e) encourage self-service models for citizens through state websites and other electronic services; and (f) promote economic development and efficient delivery of government services by encouraging governmental and private sector entities to conduct their business and transactions using electronic media.  The Electronic Government Oversight Committee shall be composed of the following:  (a) the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or his designee; (b) the State Auditor, or his designee; (c) the State Treasurer, or his designee; (d) the Secretary of State, or his designee; (e) the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, or his designee; (f) the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his designee; (g) the Commissioner of Revenue, or his designee; (h) the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks or his designee; (i) the Executive Director of the Department of Archives and History or his/her designee.  The committee shall annually elect one (1) member to serve as chairman and one (1) member to serve as vice chairman, who shall act as chairman in the absence of the chairman. The committee shall meet monthly or upon the call of the chairman, and shall make necessary reports and recommendations to the Legislature and the appropriate agencies of state government.  All agencies of state government shall cooperate with the committee in providing requested information, shall work closely with and provide information to the committee and shall report to the committee at its request.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall provide administrative support for the committee.  Nonlegislative members of the committee shall serve without compensation. (3)  The Electronic Government Oversight Committee shall advise and provide direction to the Department of Finance and Administration to develop a procurement portal that will enable potential vendors of goods and services to access relevant and necessary information related to the sale of the following types of goods and services to the State of Mississippi and its agencies: (a)  Commodities, as defined by Section 31-7-1; (b)  Contract personnel, as defined by Sections 25-9-107 and 25-9-120; and (c)  Computer equipment and services, as defined by Section 25-53-3. (4)  The procurement portal provided for in subsection (3) must provide potential vendors with the following: (a)  A searchable database of business procurement opportunities with the state which includes a breakdown by product or service and by the organization seeking the product or service; (b)  Listings of the published date and closing date for each business procurement opportunity; (c)  A "Frequently Asked Questions" section regarding doing business with the respective agencies; (d)  A breakdown of "Frequently Asked Questions" regarding the selection process with the respective agencies; (e)  An open-air forum for questions and answers relating to the procurement process, in general, as well as specifically relating to a single contract; and (f)  Links to individual agency websites and contacts to enable potential vendors to obtain more specific information, if necessary. (5)  The procurement portal must be linked to the Transparency Mississippi website established in accordance with Sections 27-104-151 through 27-104-163.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall develop and maintain a link to the procurement portal from the state website. From and after July 1, 2018, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund.  In addition, in order to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology and services, expenses for the provision of statewide shared services that facilitate cost-effective information processing and telecommunication solutions shall be defrayed by pass-through funding and shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature.  These funds shall only be utilized to pay the actual costs incurred by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services for providing these shared services to state agencies.  Furthermore, state agencies shall work in full cooperation with the Board of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS) to identify computer equipment or services to minimize duplication, reduce costs, and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries. SECTION 33.  Section 25-53-171, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-171.  (1)  There is hereby created the Wireless Communication Commission, which shall be responsible for promoting the efficient use of public resources to ensure that law enforcement personnel and essential public health and safety personnel have effective communications services available in emergency situations, and to ensure the rapid restoration of such communications services in the event of disruption caused by natural disaster, terrorist attack or other public emergency. (2)  The Wireless Communication Commission, hereafter referred to as the "commission," shall consist of the following: (a)  The Executive Director of the Department of Transportation or his designee; (b)  The Commissioner of Public Safety or his designee; (c)  The Executive Director of the Department of Public Health or his designee; (d)  The Executive Director of the Department of Information Technology Services or his designee; (e)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency or his designee; (f)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security or his designee; (g)  The President of the Mississippi Sheriffs' Association or his designee; (h)  The President of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors or his designee; (i)  The President of the Mississippi Municipal Association or his designee; (j)  The President of the Mississippi Association of Fire Chiefs or his designee; (k)  The President of the Mississippi Association of Police Chiefs or his designee; (l)  The Chief of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol or his designee; (m)  The Commissioner of the Department of Corrections or his designee; (n)  The Adjutant General of the Mississippi National Guard or his designee; (o)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality or his designee; and (p)  The Executive Director of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks or his designee. All members of the commission shall serve a term of not less than four (4) years. (3)  Within forty-five (45) days from April 21, 2005, the Executive Director of the Department of Information Technology Services shall call a meeting of the commission in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and organize by electing a chairman and other officers from its membership.  The commission shall adopt rules which govern the time and place for meetings and governing the manner of conducting its business.  The commission shall meet at least monthly and maintain minutes of such meetings.  A quorum shall consist of a majority of the membership of the commission. (4)  The commission, in conjunction with the Department of Information Technology Services, shall have the sole authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the operations of the wireless communications system described in paragraph (a) and shall be vested with all legal authority necessary and proper to perform this function including, but not limited to: (a)  Purchasing, leasing, acquiring and otherwise implementing a statewide wireless communications system to serve wireless users in state and local governments and those private entities that enter into a partnership with the commission. All purchases shall be made in accordance with public purchasing laws and, if required, shall be approved by the Department of Information Technology Services.  This system shall enable interoperability between various wireless communications technologies. (b)  Ensuring that federal/state communications requirements are followed with respect to such wireless communications systems. (c)  Providing system planning with all public safety communications systems. (d)  Assisting with establishment of state and local wireless communications. (e)  In consultation with the Department of Information Technology Services, having the authority to permit state and local agencies use of the communications system under the terms and conditions established by the commission. (f)  Providing technical support to users and bearing the overall responsibility for the design, engineering, acquisition and implementation of the statewide communications system and for ensuring the proper operation and maintenance of all equipment common to the system. (g)  Seeking proposals for services through competitive processes where required by law and selecting service providers under procedures provided for by law. (h)  Establishing, in conjunction with the Department of Information Technology Services, policies, procedures and standards which shall be incorporated into a comprehensive management plan for the operation of the statewide communications system. (i)  Having sign-off approval on all wireless communications systems within the state which are owned or operated by any state or local governmental entity, agency or department. (j)  Creating a standard user agreement. (5)  The commission, in conjunction with the Department of Information Technology Services, shall exercise its powers and duties pursuant to this section to plan, manage and administer the wireless communications system.  The commission may: (a)  In consultation with the advisory board and the Department of Information Technology Services, establish policies, procedures and standards to incorporate into a comprehensive management plan for use and operation of the communications system. (b)  Enter into mutual aid agreements among federal, state and local agencies for the use of the communications system. (c)  Establish the cost of maintenance and operation of the system and charge subscribers for access and use of the system. (d)  Assess charges for use of the system. (e)  Obtain space through rent or lease of space on any tower under state control.  The commission may also rent, lease or sublease ground space as necessary to locate equipment to support antennae on the towers.  The costs for use of such space shall be established by the owner/agent for each site when it is determined to be practicable and feasible to make space available. (f)  Provide space through rent or lease of space on any tower under the commission's control. The commission may also rent, lease or sublease ground space as necessary to locate equipment to support antennae on the towers.  The costs for use of such space shall be established by the commission when it is determined to be practicable and feasible to make space available. (g)  Refuse to lease space on any tower at any site.  All monies collected by the commission for such rents, leases or subleases shall be deposited directly into a special fund hereby created and known as the "Integrated Public Safety Communications Fund."  This fund shall be administered by the Department of Information Technology Services and may be used by the commission to construct, maintain and operate the system. (h)  Rent, lease or sublease ground space on lands acquired by the commission for the construction of privately owned or publicly owned towers.  The commission, as part of such rental, lease or sublease agreement, may require space on such towers for antennae as may be necessary for the construction and operation of the wireless communications system. (i)  Enter into and perform use and occupancy agreements concerning the system. (j)  Exercise any power necessary to carry out the intent of this law. (6)  The Department of Transportation, the Department of Public Safety and other commission members may provide to the commission, on a full-time or part-time basis, personnel and technical support necessary and sufficient to effectively and efficiently carry out the requirements of this section. (7)  (a)  Expenditures from the Integrated Public Safety Communications Fund shall be administered by the Department of Information Technology Services with expenditures approved jointly by the commission and the Department of Information Technology Services. (b)  The Integrated Public Safety Communications Fund may consist of the following: (i)  Appropriations from the Legislature; (ii)  Gifts; (iii)  Federal grants; (iv)  Fees and contributions from user agencies that the commission considers necessary to maintain and operate the system; and (v)  Monies from any other source permitted by law. (c)  Any monies remaining in the Integrated Public Safety Communications Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the State General Fund, but shall remain in the Integrated Public Safety Communications Fund. (8)  Members of the commission shall not receive any compensation or per diem, but may receive travel reimbursement provided for under Section 25-3-41. (9)  There is hereby created the Wireless Communication Advisory Board for the purpose of advising the Mississippi Wireless Communication Commission in performance of its duties. The advisory board shall be composed of the following: (a)  The Chairman and Vice Chairman of the Senate Public Utilities Committee or their designees; (b)  The Chairman and Vice Chairman of the House of Representatives Public Utilities Committee or their designees; (c)  The Chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee or his designee; (d)  The Chairman of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee or his designee; (e)  The Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee or his designee; and (f)  The Chairman of the House of Representatives Ways and Means Committee or his designee. Members of the advisory board shall receive per diem and expenses which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the advisory board shall be paid to legislative members while the Legislature is in session. (10)  It is the intent of the Legislature that all state and local government entities make available for purposes of this section all publicly owned wireless communications infrastructure, including, but not limited to, communications towers, transmission equipment, transmission frequencies and other related properties and facilities. (11)  Nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted to provide for the regulation or oversight of commercial mobile radio services. (12)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede the authority of the Department of Information Technology Services provided in Section 25-53-1 et seq. (13)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (14)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 34.  Section 25-53-191, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-191.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section unless the context otherwise clearly requires: (a) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Information Technology. (b)  "State agency" means any agency, department, commission, board, bureau, institution or other instrumentality of the state. (c)  "Wireless communication device" means a cellular telephone, pager or a personal digital assistant device having wireless communication capability. (2)  Before a wireless communication device may be assigned, issued or made available to an agency officer or employee, the agency head, or his designee, shall sign a statement certifying the need or reason for issuing the device.  No officer or employee of any state agency, except for an officer or employee of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, shall be assigned or issued more than one (1) such wireless communication device.  No officer or employee of any state agency to whom has been assigned, issued or made available the use of a wireless communication device, the cost of which is paid through the use of public funds, shall use such device for personal use. (3)  A state agency shall not reimburse any officer or employee for use of his or her personal wireless communication device. (4)  Every state agency that, at the expense of the state agency, assigns, issues or makes available to any of its officers or employees a wireless communication device shall obtain and maintain detailed billing for every wireless communication device account. A list of approved vendors for the procurement of wireless communication devices and the delivery of wireless communication device services shall be developed for all state agencies by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.  The department shall exercise the option of selecting one (1) vendor from which to procure wireless communication devices and to provide wireless communication device services, or if it deems such to be most advantageous to the state agencies, it may select multiple vendors.  The department shall select a vendor or vendors on the basis of lowest and best bid proposals.  A state agency may not procure a wireless communication device from any vendor or contract for wireless communication device services with any vendor unless the vendor appears on the list approved by the department.  A contract entered into in violation of this section shall be void and unenforceable. (5)  The department shall promulgate a model acceptable use policy defining the appropriate use of all wireless communication devices.  The department shall include in its definition of appropriate use a prohibition on the downloading, accessing, or using of a prohibited technology pursuant to the National Security on State Devices and Networks Act.  The acceptable use policy should specify that these resources, including both devices and services, are provided at the state agency's expense as tools for accomplishing the business missions of the state agency; that all those resources are for business use; and that more than incidental personal use of those resources is prohibited.  The acceptable use policy should require that each official and employee issued one (1) of the above devices or authorized to access one (1) of the above services sign the policy and that the signed copy be placed in the personnel file of the official or employee.  The acceptable use policy should also require that the use of these resources be tracked, verified and signed by the official or employee and the supervisor of the official or employee at each billing cycle or other appropriate interval. All state agencies shall adopt the model policy or adopt a policy that is, at minimum, as stringent as the model policy and shall provide a copy of the policy to the department. (6)  All state agencies shall purchase or acquire only the lowest cost cellular telephone, pager or personal digital assistance device which will carry out its intended use. (7)  The University of Mississippi Medical Center and its employees, the Mississippi State University Extension Service and its agents and faculty members, the Mississippi State University Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station and its faculty members, the Mississippi State University Forestry and Wildlife Research Center and its faculty members, and the Mississippi State University College of Veterinary Medicine and its faculty members shall be exempt from the application of this section. (8)  Employees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall be exempt from the provisions of this section when incurring international usage charges for the business-related use of their personal wireless communication devices during business-related international travel.  Such exemption shall only apply after a determination by the employer-institution that reimbursement to the employee for the use of his or her personal wireless communication device is the lowest-cost option to prevent business interruption during such travel. (9)  The State Auditor shall conduct necessary audits to ensure compliance with the provisions of this section. SECTION 35.  Section 25-53-193, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-193.  (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "National Security on State Devices and Networks Act." (2)  For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Prohibited technology" means any information technology deemed to pose an unacceptable risk to the security of the United States and/or the State of Mississippi by Mississippi and/or federal law, regulation, or guidance. (b)  "State-issued devices" means any desktop computer, laptop computer, cell phone, tablet or any other device capable of internet connectivity that is issued to a state employee pursuant to his or her employment and for use in carrying out his or her professional duties. (c)  "State-operated networks" means any telecommunications network, including, but not limited to, wireless local area networks, wireless guest networks, virtual private networks, or other information technology network systems owned or operated by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services or any other state agency. (d)  "State agency" means any agency, department, commission, board, bureau, institution or other instrumentality of the state. (e)  "State employee" means an employee or agent complying with and performing duties on behalf of the state. (3)  No state employee shall download, access, or use a prohibited technology on a state-issued device or a state-operated network. (4)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or any other appropriate state agency, shall restrict the download, access or use of prohibited technologies on state-operated networks.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall maintain and timely update a publicly available list of such prohibited technologies on its website. (5)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to law enforcement agencies of the state or its political subdivisions when downloading, accessing, or using a prohibited technology is necessary to carry out their official duties for bona fide law enforcement, investigative or public safety purposes. SECTION 36.  Section 25-53-201, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-201.  (1) There is hereby established the Enterprise Security Program which shall provide for the coordinated oversight of the cybersecurity efforts across all state agencies, including cybersecurity systems, services and the development of policies, standards and guidelines. (2)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS), in conjunction with all state agencies, shall provide centralized management and coordination of state policies for the security of data and information technology resources, which such information shall be compiled by MDITS and distributed to each participating state agency.  MDITS shall: (a)  Serve as sole authority, within the constraints of this statute, for defining the specific enterprise cybersecurity systems and services to which this statute is applicable; (b)  Acquire and operate enterprise technology solutions to provide services to state agencies when it is determined that such operation will improve the cybersecurity posture in the function of any agency, institution or function of state government as a whole; (c)  Provide oversight of enterprise security policies for state data and information technology (IT) resources including, the following: (i) Establishing and maintaining the security standards and policies for all state data and IT resources state agencies shall implement to the extent that they apply; and (ii) Including the defined enterprise security requirements as minimum requirements in the specifications for solicitation of state contracts for procuring data and information technology systems and services; (d)  Adhere to all policies, standards and guidelines in the management of technology infrastructure supporting the state data centers, telecommunications networks and backup facilities; (e) Coordinate and promote efficiency and security with all applicable laws and regulations in the acquisition, operation and maintenance of state data, cybersecurity systems and services used by agencies of the state; (f)  Manage, plan and coordinate all enterprise cybersecurity systems under the jurisdiction of the state; (g)  Develop, in conjunction with agencies of the state, coordinated enterprise cybersecurity systems and services for all state agencies; (h)  Provide ongoing analysis of enterprise cybersecurity systems and services costs, facilities and systems within state government; (i)  Develop policies, procedures and long-range plans for the use of enterprise cybersecurity systems and services; (j)  Form an advisory council of information security officers from each state agency to plan, develop and implement cybersecurity initiatives; (k) Coordinate the activities of the advisory council to provide education and awareness, identify cybersecurity-related issues, set future direction for cybersecurity plans and policy, and provide a forum for interagency communications regarding cybersecurity; (l)  Charge respective user agencies on a reimbursement basis for their proportionate cost of the installation, maintenance and operation of the cybersecurity systems and services; and (m)  Require cooperative utilization of cybersecurity systems and services by aggregating users. (3)  Each state agency's executive director or agency head shall: (a)  Be solely responsible for the security of all data and IT resources under its purview, irrespective of the location of the data or resources.  Locations include data residing: (i)  At agency sites; (ii)  On agency real property and tangible and intangible assets; (iii)  On infrastructure in the State Data Centers; (iv)  At a third-party location; (v)  In transit between locations; (b)  Ensure that an agency-wide security program is in place; (c) Designate an information security officer to administer the agency's security program; (d)  Ensure the agency adheres to the requirements established by the Enterprise Security Program, to the extent that they apply; (e) Participate in all Enterprise Security Program initiatives and services in lieu of deploying duplicate services specific to the agency; (f)  Develop, implement and maintain written agency policies and procedures to ensure the security of data and IT resources.  The agency policies and procedures are confidential information and exempt from public inspection, except that the information must be available to the Office of the State Auditor in performing auditing duties; (g) Implement policies and standards to ensure that all of the agency's data and IT resources are maintained in compliance with state and federal laws and regulations, to the extent that they apply; (h) Implement appropriate cost-effective safeguards to reduce, eliminate or recover from identified threats to data and IT resources; (i)  Ensure that internal assessments of the security program are conducted.  The results of the internal assessments are confidential and exempt from public inspection, except that the information must be available to the Office of the State Auditor in performing auditing duties; (j)  Include all appropriate cybersecurity requirements in the specifications for the agency's solicitation of state contracts for procuring data and information technology systems and services; (k)  Include a general description of the security program and future plans for ensuring security of data in the agency long-range information technology plan; (l) Participate in annual information security training designed specifically for the executive director or agency head to ensure that such individual has an understanding of: (i)  The information and information systems that support the operations and assets of the agency; (ii)  The potential impact of common types of cyber-attacks and data breaches on the agency's operations and assets; (iii) How cyber-attacks and data breaches on the agency's operations and assets could impact the operations and assets of other state agencies on the Enterprise State Network; (iv)  How cyber-attacks and data breaches occur; (v) Steps to be undertaken by the executive director or agency head and agency employees to protect their information and information systems; and (vi)  The annual reporting requirements required of the executive director or agency head. (4)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall evaluate the Enterprise Security Program.  Such evaluation shall include the following factors: (a)  Whether the Enterprise Security Program incorporates nationwide best practices; (b)  Whether opportunities exist to centralize and coordinate oversight of cybersecurity efforts across all state agencies; (c)  A review of the minimum enterprise security requirements that must be incorporated in solicitations for state contracts for procuring data and information technology systems and services; and (d)  Whether opportunities exist to expand the Enterprise Security Program, including providing oversight of cybersecurity efforts of those governing authorities as defined in Section 25-53-3(e). In performing such evaluation, the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services may retain experts.  This evaluation shall be completed by November 1, 2023.  All records in connection with this evaluation shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983, pursuant to Section 25-61-11.2(f) and (k). (5)  For the purpose of this subsection, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Cyberattack" shall mean any attempt to gain illegal access, including any data breach, to a computer, computer system or computer network for purposes of causing damage, disruption or harm. (b) "Ransomware" shall mean a computer contaminant or lock placed or introduced without authorization into a computer, computer system or computer network that restricts access by an authorized person to the computer, computer system, computer network or any data therein under circumstances in which the person responsible for the placement or introduction of the ransomware demands payment of money or other consideration to remove the computer contaminant, restore access to the computer, computer system, computer network or data, or otherwise remediate the impact of the computer contaminant or lock. (c)  From and after July 1, 2023, all state agencies shall notify the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services of any cyberattack or demand for payment as a result of ransomware no later than the close of the next business day following the discovery of such cyberattack or demand.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall develop a reporting format to be utilized by state agencies to provide such notification.  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall periodically analyze all such reports and attempt to identify any patterns or weaknesses in the state's cybersecurity efforts.  Such reports shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983, pursuant to Section 25-61-11.2(j). SECTION 37.  Section 25-53-231, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-231.  There is hereby created the "Cyber Security Review Board," which shall be responsible for ensuring a collaborative effort is made to address the cybersecurity threat posed to the State of Mississippi.  Responsibilities of the board include creating a system of reporting cybersecurity attacks within the state, researching and implementing best practices to mitigate cybersecurity risks, and connecting individuals and entities with federal and industry partners. SECTION 38.  Section 25-53-233, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-233.  The Cyber Security Review Board, hereafter referred to as the "board," shall consist of the following seven (7) members: (a)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security, or his or her designee, as chairman of the board; (b)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or his or her designee, as vice chairman of the board; (c)  The Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety, or his or her designee; (d)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, or his or her designee; (e)  The Adjutant General of the Mississippi National Guard, or his or her designee; (f)  The State Superintendent of Education, as appointed by the Mississippi Board of Education, or his or her designee; and (g)  The Attorney General of Mississippi, or his or her designee. SECTION 39.  Section 25-53-235, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-235.  (1)  Ex officio nonvoting members of the board include: (a)  The President of the Mississippi Municipal League, or his or her designee; (b)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors staff, or his or her designee; and (c)  The Chairmen of the Technology Committees of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives, or their designees. (2)  The voting members of the Cyber Security Review Board may vote to expand the board with additional ex officio nonvoting members deemed necessary to provide expertise or access to resources involving cybersecurity. SECTION 40.  Section 25-53-237, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-237.  Within forty-five (45) days of April 8, 2024, the Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security shall call a meeting of the board.  The board shall adopt rules which govern the time of meetings, place of meetings, and the manner of conducting the business of the board.  The board shall meet at least monthly and select one (1) of the ex officio nonvoting members of the board to serve as secretary, whose role it shall be to maintain minutes of each meeting of the board.  After the conclusion of each meeting, the board shall send the minutes of the meeting to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and the Chairmen of the Technology Committees of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives. A quorum shall be a majority of the voting members of the board. After twelve (12) consecutive monthly meetings, the board may vote to meet less frequently; however, the board shall meet at least once quarterly. SECTION 41.  Section 25-53-239, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-239.  The board shall produce a statewide cybersecurity report, which shall be presented to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, and the Chairmen of the Technology Committees of the Mississippi Senate and Mississippi House of Representatives by December 15 each year.  The board shall also develop a list of best practices in cybersecurity to disburse throughout the state to various parties as deemed necessary by the board. SECTION 42.  Section 25-53-241, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-241.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the "Cyber Security Review Board Fund."  Any funds which may be needed for administrative and travel expenses shall be deposited in this special fund by the Department of Public Safety from the department's regular support appropriation.  The Cyber Security Review Board Fund is a special trust fund, and the interest earned thereon shall be credited to the fund. (2)  The Department of Public Safety shall adopt regulations for the administration of the fund.  The commissioner shall administer the fund, and expenditures may be made from the fund upon requisition by the commissioner.  The department shall spend monies in the fund by an annual appropriation approved by the Legislature. SECTION 43.  Section 25-53-251, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-251.  Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263 shall be known and may be cited as the "Cloud Center of Excellence Act." SECTION 44.  Section 25-53-253, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-253.  As used in Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Cloud Center of Excellence" or "CCOE" means the centralized body responsible for providing strategic guidance, best practices, governance, and technical support for cloud adoption and management across state agencies and governing authorities. (b)  "Cloud computing" means on-demand access to computing resources, including storage, servers, and applications, delivered via the Internet or other networks. (c)  "ITS" or "department" means the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. (d)  "Governing authority" means the same as the term governing authority is defined in Section 25-53-3(2)(f). (e)  "State agency" means the same as the term "agency" is defined in Section 25-53-3(2)(e). SECTION 45.  Section 25-53-255, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-255.  (1)  There is established within the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS) a centralized Cloud Center of Excellence (CCOE) to facilitate cloud adoption across state agencies and governing authorities, enhance technological infrastructure, improve security and scalability, and streamline cloud migrations in a cost-effective and efficient manner. (2)  Using existing resources, ITS may review the process for the coordinated development, hosting and management of computer software for state agencies that use cloud computing services.  The Cloud Center of Excellence (CCOE) shall: (a)  Develop and implement a statewide strategy for cloud adoption and management; (b)  Provide guidance, best practices, and governance frameworks to state agencies and governing authorities for the adoption and use of cloud services; (c)  Establish standardized processes for cloud migrations, resource optimization, and workload assessments; (d)  Enhance cybersecurity protocols and ensure compliance with state and federal security standards; (e)  Monitor and report on the scalability, cost efficiency, and performance of cloud infrastructure; (f)  Offer training and support to agency personnel to promote cloud literacy and effective utilization; and (g)  Coordinate with state agencies and governing authorities to ensure a phased implementation schedule as required by the provision of Section 25-53-257. SECTION 46.  Section 25-53-257, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-257.  (1)  The Cloud Center of Excellence (CCOE) shall establish a two-year phased implementation plan, which shall accomplish the following benchmarks by July 1, 2027: (a)  Conduct statewide readiness assessments and develop detailed cloud migration plans for pilot agencies; (b)  Initiate pilot migrations for selected state agencies, establish key performance indicators (KPIs) and refine processes based on feedback; (c)  Expand cloud adoption to additional state agencies, focusing on optimizing resource utilization and ensuring adherence to best practices; (d)  Integrate governing authorities into the cloud ecosystem and provide support for local governments, postsecondary educational institutions and school districts; and (e)  Achieve full statewide adoption of cloud services, with ongoing monitoring, training, and optimization provided by the CCOE for all state agencies and governing authorities. (2)  During the implementation described in subsection (1), each state agency and governing authority integrated into the CCOE at that time shall consider: (a)  Cloud computing service options, including any security benefits and cost savings associated with purchasing those service options from a cloud computing service provider and from a statewide technology center established by the department, when making purchases; and (b)  Cloud computing service options and compatibility with cloud computing services in the development of new information technology software applications. (3)  (a)  Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, a state agency or governing authority shall ensure, when making purchases for an automated information system, that the system is capable of being deployed and run on cloud computing services. (b)  When making a purchase for an automated information system, a state agency or governing authority may determine that, due to integration limitations with legacy systems, security risks or costs, the state agency or governing authority is unable to purchase a system capable of being deployed and run on cloud computing services. (c)  At least fourteen (14) days before the date a state agency or governing authority solicits bids, proposals, offers or other applicable expressions of interest for a purchase described by paragraph (b) of this subsection, the state agency or governing authority shall submit a report that describes the purchase and the agency's reasoning for making the purchase of an automated information system to the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS). (4)  The department shall provide administrative support and oversight to the CCOE and ensure compliance with Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263. (5)  The department is authorized to: (a)  Enter into agreements with cloud service providers to facilitate cost-effective procurement of cloud solutions; (b)  Develop and enforce statewide cloud security and compliance standards; (c)  Establish funding mechanisms, including interagency agreements, to support the operations of the CCOE; and (d)  Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of Sections 25-53-251 through 25-53-263. SECTION 47.  Section 25-53-261, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-261.  The Legislature shall appropriate funds to the Department of Information Technology Services to implement and operate the Cloud Center of Excellence (CCOE).  The CCOE may seek additional funding through federal grants, partnerships, and other available resources. SECTION 48.  Section 25-53-281, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-281.  (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange Act." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (ITS) is tasked with conducting a comprehensive study to assess the feasibility, operational requirements and policy considerations for the implementation of a statewide data exchange initiative.  This initiative shall support secure, efficient and standardized data sharing among Mississippi state agencies and other authorized entities to support enhanced digital government services. (3)  Based on the findings of the study, ITS shall develop and oversee the phased implementation of a cloud-based statewide data exchange platform that enables agencies to share relevant data in a structured and compliant manner.  The platform shall be designed to: (a)  Facilitate secure and efficient data sharing among state agencies and other authorized entities, while ensuring appropriate access controls and data privacy safeguards; (b)  Enable a centralized data repository and interoperability framework, allowing agencies to cross-reference and validate existing state-provided programs to improve service delivery, reduce redundancy and enhance decision-making processes; and (c)  Implement data governance and security best practices in alignment with state and federal laws and regulations to safeguard sensitive and confidential information. (4)  To ensure ongoing oversight, coordination and strategic guidance for the data exchange initiative, ITS shall establish a Chief Information Officer (CIO) Council, composed of information and technology leadership from state agencies.  The CIO Council shall: (a)  Provide recommendations on technical standards, interoperability frameworks and cybersecurity protocols; (b)  Facilitate interagency collaboration to maximize data-sharing efficiencies and promote best practices; (c)  Ensure that the statewide data exchange aligns with agency-specific and statewide strategic goals developed to enhance digital government services; and (d)  Serve as an advisory body to ITS in evaluating the long-term sustainability and innovation potential of the platform. (5)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to design, develop, implement, monitor and update the statewide data exchange platform, associated governance policies and interagency coordination efforts for enhanced digital government services. (6)  To ensure the effective execution of the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange Act, the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS) shall adhere to the following timeline for key deliverables: (a)  By October 1, 2025, MDITS shall establish the CIO Council and the governance framework related thereto. (b)  Within six (6) months of the first meeting of the CIO Council, the council shall conduct a feasibility study regarding the requirements of the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange Act, and recommendations from the findings of the study shall be reported to the legislature. (c)  Within six (6) months of reporting the findings from the feasibility study to the legislature, the CIO Council shall develop a phased implementation plan for the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange. (d)  Within one (1) year of approving the phased implementation plan, MDITS and the CIO Council shall launch the initial pilot program of the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange. (e)  Within one (1) year of successfully launching the pilot program of the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange, MDITS and the CIO Council shall implement a full statewide rollout of the data exchange program. (f)  After full implementation of the data exchange program, the CIO Council shall submit annual reports to the legislature regarding the status of the data exchange program, continuous system enhancements made to the program and any additional information necessary to develop enhanced digital government experiences via the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange. SECTION 49.  Section 25-53-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-301.  (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  The State of Mississippi needs to support stakeholders as they gather information and decide the best means to utilize and oversee artificial intelligence (AI) tools and systems used by the State of Mississippi's governing bodies; (b)  The Legislature acknowledges that artificial intelligence cannot replace human creativity and involvement and so promotes responsibly using AI tools and systems while aligning and adhering to the state's long term policies, goals, values and missions while maintaining citizen trust and balancing the benefits, risks and potential dangers of artificial intelligence; and (c)  As the use of artificial intelligence has implications for state, national and personal security and privacy, the use of artificial intelligence must be conducted in a responsible, ethical, transparent and beneficial manner. (2)  There is hereby established the Artificial Intelligence Regulation (Air) Task Force. (3) (a)  The task force shall consist of the following seven (7) voting members: (i)  The Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House shall each appoint one (1) respective member of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives to serve as co-chairs of the task force; (ii)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or his or her designee; (iii)  The Director of the Mississippi Artificial Intelligence Network (MAIN), or his or her designee; (iv)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security, or his or her designee; (v)  The Adjutant General of the Mississippi National Guard, or his or her designee; and (vi)  The Attorney General of Mississippi, or his or her designee. (b)  The Chairpersons of the Artificial Intelligence Regulation (AIR) Task Force, with the advice and consent of the remaining official executive agency committee members specified in paragraph (a), or their respective designees, may appoint ex-officio nonvoting members to the task force to serve in an advisory capacity for such terms to be determined at the discretion of the task force.  The voting members of the task force, upon a majority of its membership, present and voting, and spread upon its minutes, may reduce or expand the number of ex-officio members who may serve, provided that such members are deemed necessary to provide expertise or access to resources involving AI technology and are representative of: (i)  Workforce development, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology; (ii)  Elementary and secondary education, public or private, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology; (iii)  Four-year postsecondary education, public or private, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology; (iv)  Two-year postsecondary education, public or proprietary, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology; (v)  Healthcare, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology; (vi)  Private business entity, who possesses expert knowledge of and experience with AI technology, including, but not limited to: 1.  Data storage and management; 2.  Cloud computing infrastructure; 3.  Computer power provided by graphic processing units, tensor processing units and quantum computing; 4.  Data processing and preparation through data cleaning, data integration and ETL (extract, transform and load) process; 5.  AI algorithms and frameworks; 6.  AI software and applications; 7.  Data security and privacy; 8.  AI governance and ethical frameworks; 9. Integration with business processes; 10.  Training and talent development; and (vii)  Automation and manufacturing; (viii)  Ethics and transparency; (ix)  Agriculture; and (x)  Entertainment. (4)  The Legislative members named by the Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve as co-chairs of the AIR Task Force.  The task force must meet within fifteen (15) days of the effective date of this act upon the call of the co-chairs, and at its first meeting shall elect any officers from among its members as it deems necessary for the efficient discharge of the task force's duties. (5)  The task force shall adopt rules and regulations governing times and places for meetings and governing the manner of conducting its business.  A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting any business of the task force, and a majority vote of all members present shall be required for any recommendations to the Legislature. (6)  The task force shall be responsible for balancing innovation and public interest while endeavoring to mitigate risks and unintended consequences of AI and its regulation.  The task force shall: (a)  Facilitate and evaluate through comprehensive review, develop tentative drafts of any necessary proposed revisions to the Mississippi Code involving the regulation of AI technologies, which may or may not include the following: (i)  Fostering innovation by providing an environment for businesses and organizations to develop and test AI systems under relaxed regulatory constraints; (ii)  Regulatory oversight of the designing, testing and refinement of regulations to ensure responsible AI deployment; (iii) Collaborating with stakeholders to bridge communication and idea exchanges between developers, policymakers and the public to align AI innovation with ethical and societal goals; and (iv)  Any other areas as deemed necessary by the task force. (b)  Review laws, policies and procedures concerning the use of AI technology established by the United States Congress and other state legislatures, if any, and compile a list of recommendations to include in the report required by this act.  The review shall focus on, but not be limited to focusing on: (i)  Privacy and data protection; (ii)  Development for a framework for AI testing; (iii)  Compliance with ethical standards which enforce adherence to fairness, accountability, transparency, disclosures and promoting equitable outcomes; (iv)  Assessment of risk and benefits which measures the societal and economic impact of AI innovations; (v)  Liability; (vi)  Constituent and consumer impact; (vii)  Bias and social impact; and (viii)  Copyright and provenance. (c)  Consider implementation and use of artificial intelligence in state government agencies and compile a list of recommendations of best practices and potential uses for AI technologies in government to include in the report required by this act; (d)  Consider ways to allocate funding for development and use of artificial intelligence technologies in the state and draft proposals accordingly to include in the report required by this act; and (e)  Any other issues related to artificial intelligence technologies that the task force finds appropriate to address. (7)  Members of the task force shall receive a per diem in the amount provided in Section 25-3-69 for each day engaged in the business of the task force.  Members of the task force other than the legislative members shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred while engaged in official business of the task force in accordance with Section 25-3-41, and the legislative members of the task force shall receive the expense allowance provided for in Section 5-1-47. (8)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review shall provide necessary clerical support for the meetings of the task force and the preparation of the report, with assistance from the clerical and legal staff of the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Mississippi Senate. (9)  The task force is authorized to apply for and accept gifts, grants, subsidies and other funds from persons, corporations, foundations, the United States government or other entities, and the receipt of any gifts, grants, subsidies or funds shall be reported and otherwise accounted for in the manner provided by law.  If financial subsidies are sufficient, the task force may hire additional contract staff to support its work. (10)  The term "artificial intelligence" has the meaning set forth in 15 USC § 9401(3):  a machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments.  Artificial intelligence systems use machine- and human-based inputs to perceive real and virtual environments; abstract such perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner; and use model inference to formulate options for information or action. (11)  The task force may request the assistance of the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review, the legal staffs of the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Mississippi Senate, or any other related organization with expertise in domestic relations. (12)  The work of the task force described in this act relates to sensitive matters of security. Notwithstanding any other law, the meetings, work and findings of the commission as described in this act are not subject to the requirements of Chapters 41 or 61 of Title 25, Mississippi Code of 1972. (13)  The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature annually not later than December 1 each year, and shall dissolve in December 31, 2027. SECTION 50.  Section 25-53-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-53-101.  The Legislature hereby declares it essential to the creation and maintenance of an efficient, modern, economically feasible, telecommunications system that there should be full cooperation and cohesive planning and effort by and between the several state agencies and that it is the responsibility of the said Legislature to provide statutory authority therefor.  The Legislature, therefore, declares and determines that the responsibility for these and other related purposes shall be vested in the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. SECTION 51.  Section 25-53-259, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-53-259.  (1)  Not later than November 15 of each even-numbered year, ITS, using existing resources, shall submit a report to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Speaker, the Chairpersons of the House and Senate Committees on Technology and of the House State Affairs Committee on the use of cloud computing service options by state agencies and governing authorities,  detailing the progress of the implementation plan, challenges encountered, and recommendations for improvement.  The report must include * * * use cases that provided cost savings and other benefits, including security enhancements.  All state agencies and governing authorities shall cooperate with ITS in the creation of the report by providing timely and accurate information and any assistance required by the department. SECTION 52.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.